California, session 20252026, AB1956.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 131300 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:131300. (a) The State Department of Public Health is hereby authorized to may establish the Office of Suicide Prevention in the department pursuant to this chapter. The responsibilities of the office, if established, may include all of the following:(1) Providing information and technical assistance to statewide and regional partners regarding best practices on suicide prevention policies and programs.(2) Conducting state level state-level assessment of regional and statewide suicide prevention policies and practices, including other states’ suicide prevention policies, and including policies and specific metrics and domains domains, as appropriate.(3) Monitoring and disseminating data to inform prevention efforts at the state and local levels.(4) Convening experts and stakeholders, including, but not limited to, stakeholders representing populations with high rates of suicide, to encourage collaboration and coordination of resources for suicide prevention.(5) Reporting on progress to reduce rates of suicide.(b) If established, the office may focus activities on groups with the highest risk, including youth, with special attention on boys, Native American youth, older adults, veterans, LGBTQ people, and young men.(c) (1) On or before July 1, 2028, the office, if established, shall provide a report to the Legislature on strategies to implement the activities focused on boys and young men described in subdivision (b).(2) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(3) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the reporting requirement imposed by paragraph (1) is inoperative on July 1, 2032.